Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2312
Certificate of competency; requirement.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in business as an air conditioning air distribution contractor or to engage in the business of installing, altering, repairing, cleaning, adding to or changing in any manner any air conditioning air distribution system or any furnace, restaurant appliance hood or its duct system or any other exhaust or intake ventilating system within a city or village having an air conditioning air distribution board or within the area of zoning jurisdiction outside the corporate limits of cities of the metropolitan class having such a board unless he holds a certificate or is employed by a person, firm, or corporation holding such a certificate.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 12, p. 472.